Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1379.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302(a) and (d) of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 302. Forests.(a) Acquisition, establishment and disposition.--The department has the following powers and duties with respect to the acquisition, establishment and disposition of State forest <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223 lands and certain other Commonwealth-owned resources:* * *(14) To reimburse activities approved and submitted FOR EXPENSES INCURRED under subsection (d)(13) and (14) . FROM THE FOREST FIRE WARDEN FUND.* * *(d) Chief Forest Fire Warden.--The Chief Forest Fire Warden, subject to the approval of the secretary, shall have the following powers and duties to:* * *(13) Approve activities to be carried out by local forest fire wardens, including:(i) Controlled or prescribed burns.(ii) Public relations events.(iii) Fire investigations . , SUPPRESSION, PATROL AND LOOKOUT DUTIES.(iv) Training required by the department for local fire wardens.(V) RESPONDING TO MUTUAL AID REQUESTS MADE BY THE PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY OR THE GOVERNOR FOR AN EMERGENCY IDENTIFIED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY OR THE GOVERNOR.(14) Establish a form and manner for local forest fire wardens to request reimbursement from the department for activities approved under paragraph (13).* * *SECTION 2. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 302.1. FOREST FIRE WARDEN FUND.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--THE FOREST FIRE WARDEN FUND IS ESTABLISHED AS A SEPARATE FUND IN THE STATE TREASURY. MONEY IN 20250HB1379PN2706 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FUND IS APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT ON A CONTINUING BASIS FOR THE PURPOSES UNDER SUBSECTION (B).(B) PURPOSES.--MONEY IN THE FUND SHALL BE USED FOR REIMBURSEMENT UNDER SECTION 302(A)(14) AND ANY OTHER EXPENSES DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE CHIEF FOREST FIRE WARDEN, SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY, TO CARRY OUT THE FUNCTIONS UNDER SECTION 302.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1379PN2706 - 3 - <--12345678